Tennessee, session 114, HB1345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-28-505(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "fourteen (14) days" and substituting "seven (7) days".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-28-505(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "fourteen (14) days" and substituting "seven (7) days".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-7-109(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Except as provided in this section:
(A) Seven (7) days' notice by a landlord is sufficient notice of termination
of tenancy for the purpose of eviction of a residential tenant, if the termination of
tenancy is for one (1) of the following reasons:
(i) Tenant neglect or refusal to pay rent that is due and is in
arrears, upon demand; or
(ii) The tenant or any other person on the premises with the
tenant's consent willfully or intentionally commits a violent act or behaves
in a manner which constitutes or threatens to be a real and present
danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the life or property of other
tenants, the landlord, the landlord's representatives, or other persons on
the premises; and
HB1345
001079
- 1 -

(B) Fourteen (14) days' notice by a landlord is sufficient notice of
termination of tenancy for the purpose of eviction of a residential tenant, if the
termination of tenancy is for damage beyond normal wear and tear to the
premises by the tenant, members of the household, or guests.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-7-109(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(B)" and substituting "subdivision
(a)(1)(A)(i) or (a)(1)(B)" and by deleting the language "upon at least fourteen (14) days' written
notice" and substituting "upon at least seven (7) days' written notice for a breach of subdivision
(a)(1)(A)(i) or at least fourteen (14) days' notice for a breach of subdivision (a)(1)(B) and".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to rental agreements entered into, amended, or renewed on or after that date.
- 2 - 001079